Florida, session 2026, SB938.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSubsection (14) is added to section 704.06, 21 Florida Statutes, to read: 22 704.06âConservation easements; creation; acquisition; 23 enforcement.â 24 (14)(a)âUpon application to a water management district by 25 the fee simple owner of a parcel of land subject to a 26 conservation easement, the water management district must 27 release the conservation easement if all of the following 28 conditions are met: 29 1.âThe land subject to the conservation easement is fewer 30 than 15 acres and is bordered on three or more sides by 31 impervious surfaces. 32 2.âAny undeveloped adjacent parcels of land are fewer than 33 15 acres and similarly bordered on three or more sides by 34 impervious surfaces. 35 3.âThe land contains no historical, architectural, 36 archeological, or cultural significance. 37 4.âThe applicant has secured sufficient mitigation credits 38 and has compensated the water management district by using the 39 uniform mitigation assessment method from a mitigation bank 40 located in this state to offset the loss of any wetlands located 41 on the land subject to the conservation easement pursuant to s. 42 373.4135. 43 (b)âUpon the water management districtâs release of the 44 conservation easement, the ad valorem taxes on the property must 45 be based on the just value of the property, and the property may 46 be used for development that is consistent with the zoning 47 designation of the adjacent lands. 48 (c)âThe property owner assumes responsibility for any 49 stormwater requirements if the property is developed. 50 (d)âThe property owner shall comply with all local 51 ordinances related to stormwater management for any development 52 proposed for the subject parcel and, if applicable, seek the 53 districtâs approval for the modification of any stormwater 54 permits upon which the conservation easement was a condition. 55 (e)âThis subsection does not apply to conservation 56 easements located within residential developments or to 57 proprietary conservation easements held by a district. 58 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.